static/hunspell/29.12.2023/bash.aff
FLAG long
SFX N15 к гобоҙҙағылайҙыр к	+PxPl1+Der/дағы+Der/дай+Indf
SFX N15 к гоғоҙҙағылайҙыр к	+PxPl2+Der/дағы+Der/дай+Indf
SFX N15 к гомдағысалыр к	+PxSg1+Der/дағы+Der/са+Indf
SFX N15 к гоңдағысалыр к	+PxSg2+Der/дағы+Der/са+Indf
SFX N15 к гондағысалыр к	+PxSg3+Der/дағы+Der/са+Indf
SFX N15 к гобоҙҙағысалыр к	+PxPl1+Der/дағы+Der/са+Indf
SFX N15 к гоғоҙҙағысалыр к	+PxPl2+Der/дағы+Der/са+Indf
SFX N15 к гомдағылайсы к	+PxSg1+Der/дағы+Der/дай+Clt/сы
SFX N15 к гоңдағылайсы к	+PxSg2+Der/дағы+Der/дай+Clt/сы
SFX N15 к гондағылайсы к	+PxSg3+Der/дағы+Der/дай+Clt/сы
SFX N15 к гобоҙҙағылайсы к	+PxPl1+Der/дағы+Der/дай+Clt/сы
SFX N15 к гоғоҙҙағылайсы к	+PxPl2+Der/дағы+Der/дай+Clt/сы
SFX N15 к гомдағысасы к	+PxSg1+Der/дағы+Der/са+Clt/сы
SFX N15 к гоңдағысасы к	+PxSg2+Der/дағы+Der/са+Clt/сы
SFX N15 к гондағысасы к	+PxSg3+Der/дағы+Der/са+Clt/сы
SFX N15 к гобоҙҙағысасы к	+PxPl1+Der/дағы+Der/са+Clt/сы
SFX N15 к гоғоҙҙағысасы к	+PxPl2+Der/дағы+Der/са+Clt/сы
SFX N15 к гомаса к	+PxSg1+Der/ҡаса
SFX N15 к гоңаса к	+PxSg2+Der/ҡаса
SFX N15 к гонаса к	+PxSg3+Der/ҡаса
SFX N15 к гобоҙғаса к	+PxPl1+Der/ҡаса
SFX N15 к гоғоҙғаса к	+PxPl2+Der/ҡаса
SFX N15 к гомасамы к	+PxSg1+Der/ҡаса+Q
SFX N15 к гоңасамы к	+PxSg2+Der/ҡаса+Q
SFX N15 к гонасамы к	+PxSg3+Der/ҡаса+Q
SFX N15 к гобоҙғасамы к	+PxPl1+Der/ҡаса+Q
SFX N15 к гоғоҙғасамы к	+PxPl2+Der/ҡаса+Q
SFX N15 к гомасалыр к	+PxSg1+Der/ҡаса+Indf
SFX N15 к гоңасалыр к	+PxSg2+Der/ҡаса+Indf
SFX N15 к гонасалыр к	+PxSg3+Der/ҡаса+Indf
SFX N15 к гобоҙғасалыр к	+PxPl1+Der/ҡаса+Indf
SFX N15 к гоғоҙғасалыр к	+PxPl2+Der/ҡаса+Indf
SFX N15 к гомасасы к	+PxSg1+Der/ҡаса+Clt/сы
SFX N15 к гоңасасы к	+PxSg2+Der/ҡаса+Clt/сы
SFX N15 к гонасасы к	+PxSg3+Der/ҡаса+Clt/сы
SFX N15 к гобоҙғасасы к	+PxPl1+Der/ҡаса+Clt/сы
SFX N15 к гоғоҙғасасы к	+PxPl2+Der/ҡаса+Clt/сы
SFX N15 ҡ ғомдоң ҡ	+PxSg1+Gen
SFX N15 ҡ ғоңдоң ҡ	+PxSg2+Gen
SFX N15 ҡ ғоноң ҡ	+PxSg3+Gen
SFX N15 ҡ ғобоҙҙоң ҡ	+PxPl1+Gen
SFX N15 ҡ ғоғоҙҙоң ҡ	+PxPl2+Gen
SFX N15 ҡ ғома ҡ	+PxSg1+Dat
SFX N15 ҡ ғоңа ҡ	+PxSg2+Dat
SFX N15 ҡ ғона ҡ	+PxSg3+Dat
SFX N15 ҡ ғобоҙға ҡ	+PxPl1+Dat
SFX N15 ҡ ғоғоҙға ҡ	+PxPl2+Dat
SFX N15 ҡ ғомдо ҡ	+PxSg1+Acc
SFX N15 ҡ ғоңдо ҡ	+PxSg2+Acc
SFX N15 ҡ ғон ҡ	+PxSg3+Acc
SFX N15 ҡ ғобоҙҙо ҡ	+PxPl1+Acc
SFX N15 ҡ ғоғоҙҙо ҡ	+PxPl2+Acc
SFX N15 ҡ ғомдан ҡ	+PxSg1+Abl
SFX N15 ҡ ғоңдан ҡ	+PxSg2+Abl
SFX N15 ҡ ғонан ҡ	+PxSg3+Abl
SFX N15 ҡ ғобоҙҙан ҡ	+PxPl1+Abl
SFX N15 ҡ ғоғоҙҙан ҡ	+PxPl2+Abl
SFX N15 ҡ ғомда ҡ	+PxSg1+Loc
SFX N15 ҡ ғоңда ҡ	+PxSg2+Loc
SFX N15 ҡ ғонда ҡ	+PxSg3+Loc
SFX N15 ҡ ғобоҙҙа ҡ	+PxPl1+Loc
SFX N15 ҡ ғоғоҙҙа ҡ	+PxPl2+Loc
SFX N15 ҡ ғомдоңмо ҡ	+PxSg1+Gen+Q
SFX N15 ҡ ғоңдоңмо ҡ	+PxSg2+Gen+Q
SFX N15 ҡ ғоноңмо ҡ	+PxSg3+Gen+Q
SFX N15 ҡ ғобоҙҙоңмо ҡ	+PxPl1+Gen+Q
SFX N15 ҡ ғоғоҙҙоңмо ҡ	+PxPl2+Gen+Q
SFX N15 ҡ ғомамы ҡ	+PxSg1+Dat+Q
SFX N15 ҡ ғоңамы ҡ	+PxSg2+Dat+Q
SFX N15 ҡ ғонамы ҡ	+PxSg3+Dat+Q
SFX N15 ҡ ғобоҙғамы ҡ	+PxPl1+Dat+Q
SFX N15 ҡ ғоғоҙғамы ҡ	+PxPl2+Dat+Q
SFX N15 ҡ ғомдомо ҡ	+PxSg1+Acc+Q
SFX N15 ҡ ғоңдомо ҡ	+PxSg2+Acc+Q
SFX N15 ҡ ғонмо ҡ	+PxSg3+Acc+Q
SFX N15 ҡ ғобоҙҙомо ҡ	+PxPl1+Acc+Q
SFX N15 ҡ ғоғоҙҙомо ҡ	+PxPl2+Acc+Q
SFX N15 ҡ ғомданмы ҡ	+PxSg1+Abl+Q
SFX N15 ҡ ғоңданмы ҡ	+PxSg2+Abl+Q
SFX N15 ҡ ғонанмы ҡ	+PxSg3+Abl+Q
SFX N15 ҡ ғобоҙҙанмы ҡ	+PxPl1+Abl+Q
SFX N15 ҡ ғоғоҙҙанмы ҡ	+PxPl2+Abl+Q
SFX N15 ҡ ғомдамы ҡ	+PxSg1+Loc+Q
SFX N15 ҡ ғоңдамы ҡ	+PxSg2+Loc+Q
SFX N15 ҡ ғондамы ҡ	+PxSg3+Loc+Q
SFX N15 ҡ ғобоҙҙамы ҡ	+PxPl1+Loc+Q
SFX N15 ҡ ғоғоҙҙамы ҡ	+PxPl2+Loc+Q
SFX N15 ҡ ғомдоңмолор ҡ	+PxSg1+Gen+Q+Indf
SFX N15 ҡ ғоңдоңмолор ҡ	+PxSg2+Gen+Q+Indf
SFX N15 ҡ ғоноңмолор ҡ	+PxSg3+Gen+Q+Indf
SFX N15 ҡ ғобоҙҙоңмолор ҡ	+PxPl1+Q+Indf
SFX N15 ҡ ғоғоҙҙоңмолор ҡ	+PxPl2+Q+Indf
SFX N15 ҡ ғомамылыр ҡ	+PxSg1+Dat+Q+Indf
SFX N15 ҡ ғоңамылыр ҡ	+PxSg2+Dat+Q+Indf
SFX N15 ҡ ғонамылыр ҡ	+PxSg3+Dat+Q+Indf
SFX N15 ҡ ғобоҙғамылыр ҡ	+PxPl1+Dat+Q+Indf
SFX N15 ҡ ғоғоҙғамылыр ҡ	+PxPl2+Dat+Q+Indf
SFX N15 ҡ ғомдомолор ҡ	+PxSg1+Acc+Q+Indf
SFX N15 ҡ ғоңдомолор ҡ	+PxSg2+Acc+Q+Indf
SFX N15 ҡ ғонмолор ҡ	+PxSg3+Acc+Q+Indf
SFX N15 ҡ ғобоҙҙомолор ҡ	+PxPl1+Acc+Q+Indf
SFX N15 ҡ ғоғоҙҙомолор ҡ	+PxPl2+Acc+Q+Indf
SFX N15 ҡ ғомданмылыр ҡ	+PxSg1+Abl+Q+Indf
SFX N15 ҡ ғоңданмылыр ҡ	+PxSg2+Abl+Q+Indf
SFX N15 ҡ ғонанмылыр ҡ	+PxSg3+Abl+Q+Indf
SFX N15 ҡ ғобоҙҙанмылыр ҡ	+PxPl1+Abl+Q+Indf
SFX N15 ҡ ғоғоҙҙанмылыр ҡ	+PxPl2+Abl+Q+Indf
SFX N15 ҡ ғомдамылыр ҡ	+PxSg1+Locl+Q+Indf
SFX N15 ҡ ғоңдамылыр ҡ	+PxSg2+Locl+Q+Indf
SFX N15 ҡ ғондамылыр ҡ	+PxSg3+Locl+Q+Indf
SFX N15 ҡ ғобоҙҙамылыр ҡ	+PxPl1+Locl+Q+Indf
SFX N15 ҡ ғоғоҙҙамылыр ҡ	+PxPl2+Locl+Q+Indf
SFX N15 ҡ ғомдоңдор ҡ	+PxSg1+Gen+Indf
SFX N15 ҡ ғоңдоңдор ҡ	+PxSg2+Gen+Indf
SFX N15 ҡ ғоноңдор ҡ	+PxSg3+Gen+Indf
SFX N15 ҡ ғобоҙҙоңдор ҡ	+PxPl1+Gen+Indf
SFX N15 ҡ ғоғоҙҙоңдор ҡ	+PxPl2+Gen+Indf
SFX N15 ҡ ғомалыр ҡ	+PxSg1+Dat+Indf
SFX N15 ҡ ғоңалыр ҡ	+PxSg2+Dat+Indf
SFX N15 ҡ ғоналыр ҡ	+PxSg3+Dat+Indf
SFX N15 ҡ ғобоҙғалыр ҡ	+PxPl1+Dat+Indf
SFX N15 ҡ ғоғоҙғалыр ҡ	+PxPl2+Dat+Indf
SFX N15 ҡ ғомдолор ҡ	+PxSg1+Acc+Indf
SFX N15 ҡ ғоңдолор ҡ	+PxSg2+Acc+Indf
SFX N15 ҡ ғондор ҡ	+PxSg3+Acc+Indf
SFX N15 ҡ ғобоҙҙолор ҡ	+PxPl1+Acc+Indf
SFX N15 ҡ ғоғоҙҙолор ҡ	+PxPl2+Acc+Indf
SFX N15 ҡ ғомдандыр ҡ	+PxSg1+Abl+Indf
SFX N15 ҡ ғоңдандыр ҡ	+PxSg2+Abl+Indf
SFX N15 ҡ ғонандыр ҡ	+PxSg3+Abl+Indf
SFX N15 ҡ ғобоҙҙандыр ҡ	+PxPl1+Abl+Indf
SFX N15 ҡ ғоғоҙҙандыр ҡ	+PxPl2+Abl+Indf
SFX N15 ҡ ғомдалыр ҡ	+PxSg1+Loc+Indf
SFX N15 ҡ ғоңдалыр ҡ	+PxSg2+Loc+Indf
SFX N15 ҡ ғондалыр ҡ	+PxSg3+Loc+Indf
SFX N15 ҡ ғобоҙҙалыр ҡ	+PxPl1+Loc+Indf
SFX N15 ҡ ғоғоҙҙалыр ҡ	+PxPl2+Loc+Indf
SFX N15 ҡ ғомдоңсо ҡ	+PxSg1+Gen+Clt/сы
SFX N15 ҡ ғоңдоңсо ҡ	+PxSg2+Gen+Clt/сы
SFX N15 ҡ ғоноңсо ҡ	+PxSg3+Gen+Clt/сы
SFX N15 ҡ ғобоҙҙоңсо ҡ	+PxPl1+Gen+Clt/сы
SFX N15 ҡ ғоғоҙҙоңсо ҡ	+PxPl2+Gen+Clt/сы
SFX N15 ҡ ғомасы ҡ	+PxSg1+Dat+Clt/сы
SFX N15 ҡ ғоңасы ҡ	+PxSg2+Dat+Clt/сы
SFX N15 ҡ ғонасы ҡ	+PxSg3+Dat+Clt/сы
SFX N15 ҡ ғобоҙғасы ҡ	+PxPl1+Dat+Clt/сы
SFX N15 ҡ ғоғоҙғасы ҡ	+PxPl2+Dat+Clt/сы
SFX N15 ҡ ғомдосо ҡ	+PxSg1+Acc+Clt/сы
SFX N15 ҡ ғоңдосо ҡ	+PxSg2+Acc+Clt/сы
SFX N15 ҡ ғонсо ҡ	+PxSg3+Acc+Clt/сы
SFX N15 ҡ ғобоҙҙосо ҡ	+PxPl1+Acc+Clt/сы
SFX N15 ҡ ғоғоҙҙосо ҡ	+PxPl2+Acc+Clt/сы
SFX N15 ҡ ғомдансы ҡ	+PxSg1+Abl+Clt/сы
SFX N15 ҡ ғоңдансы ҡ	+PxSg2+Abl+Clt/сы
SFX N15 ҡ ғонансы ҡ	+PxSg3+Abl+Clt/сы
SFX N15 ҡ ғобоҙҙансы ҡ	+PxPl1+Abl+Clt/сы
SFX N15 ҡ ғоғоҙҙансы ҡ	+PxPl2+Abl+Clt/сы
SFX N15 ҡ ғомдасы ҡ	+PxSg1+Loc+Clt/сы
SFX N15 ҡ ғоңдасы ҡ	+PxSg2+Loc+Clt/сы
SFX N15 ҡ ғондасы ҡ	+PxSg3+Loc+Clt/сы
SFX N15 ҡ ғобоҙҙасы ҡ	+PxPl1+Loc+Clt/сы
SFX N15 ҡ ғоғоҙҙасы ҡ	+PxPl2+Loc+Clt/сы
SFX N15 ҡ ғоммо ҡ	+PxSg1+Q
SFX N15 ҡ ғоңмо ҡ	+PxSg2+Q
SFX N15 ҡ ғомо ҡ	+PxSg3+Q
SFX N15 ҡ ғобоҙмо ҡ	+PxPl1+Q
SFX N15 ҡ ғоғоҙмо ҡ	+PxPl2+Q
SFX N15 ҡ ғоммолор ҡ	+PxSg1+Q+Indf
SFX N15 ҡ ғоңмолор ҡ	+PxSg2+Q+Indf
SFX N15 ҡ ғомолор ҡ	+PxSg3+Q+Indf
SFX N15 ҡ ғобоҙмолор ҡ	+PxPl1+Q+Indf
SFX N15 ҡ ғоғоҙмолор ҡ	+PxPl2+Q+Indf
SFX N15 ҡ ғомдор ҡ	+PxSg1+Indf
SFX N15 ҡ ғоңдор ҡ	+PxSg2+Indf
SFX N15 ҡ ғолор ҡ	+PxSg3+Indf
SFX N15 ҡ ғобоҙҙор ҡ	+PxPl1+Indf
SFX N15 ҡ ғоғоҙҙор ҡ	+PxPl2+Indf
SFX N15 ҡ ғомсо ҡ	+PxSg1+Clt/сы
SFX N15 ҡ ғоңсо ҡ	+PxSg2+Clt/сы
SFX N15 ҡ ғосо ҡ	+PxSg3+Clt/сы
SFX N15 ҡ ғобоҙсо ҡ	+PxPl1+Clt/сы
SFX N15 ҡ ғоғоҙсо ҡ	+PxPl2+Clt/сы
SFX N15 ҡ ғомдоҡо ҡ	+PxSg1+Poss
SFX N15 ҡ ғоңдоҡо ҡ	+PxSg2+Poss
SFX N15 ҡ ғоноҡо ҡ	+PxSg3+Poss
SFX N15 ҡ ғобоҙҙоҡо ҡ	+PxPl1+Poss
SFX N15 ҡ ғоғоҙҙоҡо ҡ	+PxPl2+Poss
SFX N15 ҡ ғомдоҡоноң ҡ	+PxSg1+Poss+Gen
SFX N15 ҡ ғоңдоҡоноң ҡ	+PxSg2+Poss+Gen
SFX N15 ҡ ғоноҡоноң ҡ	+PxSg3+Poss+Gen
SFX N15 ҡ ғобоҙҙоҡоноң ҡ	+PxPl1+Poss+Gen
SFX N15 ҡ ғоғоҙҙоҡоноң ҡ	+PxPl2+Poss+Gen
SFX N15 ҡ ғомдоҡона ҡ	+PxSg1+Poss+Dat
SFX N15 ҡ ғоңдоҡона ҡ	+PxSg2+Poss+Dat
SFX N15 ҡ ғоноҡона ҡ	+PxSg3+Poss+Dat
SFX N15 ҡ ғобоҙҙоҡона ҡ	+PxPl1+Poss+Dat
SFX N15 ҡ ғоғоҙҙоҡона ҡ	+PxPl2+Poss+Dat
SFX N15 ҡ ғомдоҡон ҡ	+PxSg1+Poss+Acc
SFX N15 ҡ ғоңдоҡон ҡ	+PxSg2+Poss+Acc
SFX N15 ҡ ғоноҡон ҡ	+PxSg3+Poss+Acc
SFX N15 ҡ ғобоҙҙоҡон ҡ	+PxPl1+Poss+Acc
SFX N15 ҡ ғоғоҙҙоҡон ҡ	+PxPl2+Poss+Acc
SFX N15 ҡ ғомдоҡонан ҡ	+PxSg1+Poss+Acc
SFX N15 ҡ ғоңдоҡонан ҡ	+PxSg2+Poss+Acc
SFX N15 ҡ ғоноҡонан ҡ	+PxSg3+Poss+Acc
SFX N15 ҡ ғобоҙҙоҡонан ҡ	+PxPl1+Poss+Acc
SFX N15 ҡ ғоғоҙҙоҡонан ҡ	+PxPl2+Poss+Acc
SFX N15 ҡ ғомдоҡонда ҡ	+PxSg1+Poss+Loc
SFX N15 ҡ ғоңдоҡонда ҡ	+PxSg2+Poss+Loc
SFX N15 ҡ ғоноҡонда ҡ	+PxSg3+Poss+Loc
SFX N15 ҡ ғобоҙҙоҡонда ҡ	+PxPl1+Poss+Loc
SFX N15 ҡ ғоғоҙҙоҡонда ҡ	+PxPl2+Poss+Loc
SFX N15 ҡ ғомдоҡоноңмо ҡ	+PxSg1+Poss+Gen+Q
SFX N15 ҡ ғоңдоҡоноңмо ҡ	+PxSg2+Poss+Gen+Q
SFX N15 ҡ ғоноҡоноңмо ҡ	+PxSg3+Poss+Gen+Q
SFX N15 ҡ ғобоҙҙоҡоноңмо ҡ	+PxPl1+Poss+Gen+Q
SFX N15 ҡ ғоғоҙҙоҡоноңмо ҡ	+PxPl2+Poss+Gen+Q
SFX N15 ҡ ғомдоҡонамы ҡ	+PxSg1+Poss+Dat+Q
SFX N15 ҡ ғоңдоҡонамы ҡ	+PxSg2+Poss+Dat+Q
SFX N15 ҡ ғоноҡонамы ҡ	+PxSg3+Poss+Dat+Q
SFX N15 ҡ ғобоҙҙоҡонамы ҡ	+PxPl1+Poss+Dat+Q
SFX N15 ҡ ғоғоҙҙоҡонамы ҡ	+PxPl2+Poss+Dat+Q
SFX N15 ҡ ғомдоҡонмо ҡ	+PxSg1+Poss+Acc+Q
SFX N15 ҡ ғоңдоҡонмо ҡ	+PxSg2+Poss+Acc+Q
SFX N15 ҡ ғоноҡонмо ҡ	+PxSg3+Poss+Acc+Q
SFX N15 ҡ ғобоҙҙоҡонмо ҡ	+PxPl1+Poss+Acc+Q
SFX N15 ҡ ғоғоҙҙоҡонмо ҡ	+PxPl2+Poss+Acc+Q
SFX N15 ҡ ғомдоҡонанмы ҡ	+PxSg1+Poss+Abl+Q
SFX N15 ҡ ғоңдоҡонанмы ҡ	+PxSg2+Poss+Abl+Q
SFX N15 ҡ ғоноҡонанмы ҡ	+PxSg3+Poss+Abl+Q
SFX N15 ҡ ғобоҙҙоҡонанмы ҡ	+PxPl1+Poss+Abl+Q
SFX N15 ҡ ғоғоҙҙоҡонанмы ҡ	+PxPl2+Poss+Abl+Q
SFX N15 ҡ ғомдоҡондамы ҡ	+PxSg1+Poss+Loc+Q
SFX N15 ҡ ғоңдоҡондамы ҡ	+PxSg2+Poss+Loc+Q
SFX N15 ҡ ғоноҡондамы ҡ	+PxSg3+Poss+Loc+Q
SFX N15 ҡ ғобоҙҙоҡондамы ҡ	+PxPl1+Poss+Loc+Q
SFX N15 ҡ ғоғоҙҙоҡондамы ҡ	+PxPl2+Poss+Loc+Q
SFX N15 ҡ ғомдоҡоноңдор ҡ	+PxSg1+Poss+Gen+Indf
SFX N15 ҡ ғоңдоҡоноңдор ҡ	+PxSg2+Poss+Gen+Indf
SFX N15 ҡ ғоноҡоноңдор ҡ	+PxSg3+Poss+Gen+Indf
SFX N15 ҡ ғобоҙҙоҡоноңдор ҡ	+PxPl1+Poss+Gen+Indf
SFX N15 ҡ ғоғоҙҙоҡоноңдор ҡ	+PxPl2+Poss+Gen+Indf
SFX N15 ҡ ғомдоҡоналыр ҡ	+PxSg1+Poss+Dat+Indf
SFX N15 ҡ ғоңдоҡоналыр ҡ	+PxSg2+Poss+Dat+Indf
SFX N15 ҡ ғоноҡоналыр ҡ	+PxSg3+Poss+Dat+Indf
SFX N15 ҡ ғобоҙҙоҡоналыр ҡ	+PxPl1+Poss+Dat+Indf
SFX N15 ҡ ғоғоҙҙоҡоналыр ҡ	+PxPl2+Poss+Dat+Indf
SFX N15 ҡ ғомдоҡондор ҡ	+PxSg1+Poss+Acc+Indf
SFX N15 ҡ ғоңдоҡондор ҡ	+PxSg2+Poss+Acc+Indf
SFX N15 ҡ ғоноҡондор ҡ	+PxSg3+Poss+Acc+Indf
SFX N15 ҡ ғобоҙҙоҡондор ҡ	+PxPl1+Poss+Acc+Indf
SFX N15 ҡ ғоғоҙҙоҡондор ҡ	+PxPl2+Poss+Acc+Indf
SFX N15 ҡ ғомдоҡонандыр ҡ	+PxSg1+Poss+Abl+Indf
SFX N15 ҡ ғоңдоҡонандыр ҡ	+PxSg2+Poss+Abl+Indf
SFX N15 ҡ ғоноҡонандыр ҡ	+PxSg3+Poss+Abl+Indf
SFX N15 ҡ ғобоҙҙоҡонандыр ҡ	+PxPl1+Poss+Abl+Indf
SFX N15 ҡ ғоғоҙҙоҡонандыр ҡ	+PxPl2+Poss+Abl+Indf
SFX N15 ҡ ғомдоҡондалыр ҡ	+PxSg1+Poss+Loc+Indf
SFX N15 ҡ ғоңдоҡондалыр ҡ	+PxSg2+Poss+Loc+Indf
SFX N15 ҡ ғоноҡондалыр ҡ	+PxSg3+Poss+Loc+Indf
SFX N15 ҡ ғобоҙҙоҡондалыр ҡ	+PxPl1+Poss+Loc+Indf
SFX N15 ҡ ғоғоҙҙоҡондалыр ҡ	+PxPl2+Poss+Loc+Indf
SFX N15 ҡ ғомдоҡоноңсо ҡ	+PxSg1+Poss+Gen+Clt/сы
SFX N15 ҡ ғоңдоҡоноңсо ҡ	+PxSg2+Poss+Gen+Clt/сы
SFX N15 ҡ ғоноҡоноңсо ҡ	+PxSg3+Poss+Gen+Clt/сы
SFX N15 ҡ ғобоҙҙоҡоноңсо ҡ	+PxPl1+Poss+Gen+Clt/сы
SFX N15 ҡ ғоғоҙҙоҡоноңсо ҡ	+PxPl2+Poss+Gen+Clt/сы
SFX N15 ҡ ғомдоҡонасы ҡ	+PxSg1+Poss+Dat+Clt/сы
SFX N15 ҡ ғоңдоҡонасы ҡ	+PxSg2+Poss+Dat+Clt/сы
SFX N15 ҡ ғоноҡонасы ҡ	+PxSg3+Poss+Dat+Clt/сы
SFX N15 ҡ ғобоҙҙоҡонасы ҡ	+PxPl1+Poss+Dat+Clt/сы
SFX N15 ҡ ғоғоҙҙоҡонасы ҡ	+PxPl2+Poss+Dat+Clt/сы
SFX N15 ҡ ғомдоҡонсо ҡ	+PxSg1+Poss+Acc+Clt/сы
SFX N15 ҡ ғоңдоҡонсо ҡ	+PxSg2+Poss+Acc+Clt/сы
SFX N15 ҡ ғоноҡонсо ҡ	+PxSg3+Poss+Acc+Clt/сы
SFX N15 ҡ ғобоҙҙоҡонсо ҡ	+PxPl1+Poss+Acc+Clt/сы
SFX N15 ҡ ғоғоҙҙоҡонсо ҡ	+PxPl2+Poss+Acc+Clt/сы
SFX N15 ҡ ғомдоҡонансы ҡ	+PxSg1+Poss+Abl+Clt/сы
SFX N15 ҡ ғоңдоҡонансы ҡ	+PxSg2+Poss+Abl+Clt/сы
SFX N15 ҡ ғоноҡонансы ҡ	+PxSg3+Poss+Abl+Clt/сы
SFX N15 ҡ ғобоҙҙоҡонансы ҡ	+PxPl1+Poss+Abl+Clt/сы
SFX N15 ҡ ғоғоҙҙоҡонансы ҡ	+PxPl2+Poss+Abl+Clt/сы
SFX N15 ҡ ғомдоҡондасы ҡ	+PxSg1+Poss+Loc+Clt/сы
SFX N15 ҡ ғоңдоҡондасы ҡ	+PxSg2+Poss+Loc+Clt/сы
SFX N15 ҡ ғоноҡондасы ҡ	+PxSg3+Poss+Loc+Clt/сы
SFX N15 ҡ ғобоҙҙоҡондасы ҡ	+PxPl1+Poss+Loc+Clt/сы
SFX N15 ҡ ғоғоҙҙоҡондасы ҡ	+PxPl2+Poss+Loc+Clt/сы
SFX N15 ҡ ғомдоҡомо ҡ	+PxSg1+Poss +Q
SFX N15 ҡ ғоңдоҡомо ҡ	+PxSg2+Poss +Q
SFX N15 ҡ ғоноҡомо ҡ	+PxSg3+Poss +Q
SFX N15 ҡ ғобоҙҙоҡомо ҡ	+PxPl1+Poss +Q
SFX N15 ҡ ғоғоҙҙоҡомо ҡ	+PxPl2+Poss +Q
SFX N15 ҡ ғомдоҡолор ҡ	+PxSg1+Poss +Indf
SFX N15 ҡ ғоңдоҡолор ҡ	+PxSg2+Poss +Indf
SFX N15 ҡ ғоноҡолор ҡ	+PxSg3+Poss +Indf
SFX N15 ҡ ғобоҙҙоҡолор ҡ	+PxPl1+Poss +Indf
SFX N15 ҡ ғоғоҙҙоҡолор ҡ	+PxPl2+Poss +Indf
SFX N15 ҡ ғомдоҡосо ҡ	+PxSg1+Poss +Clt/сы
